fi: Matkapuhelimen mukana tulevat lisävarusteet: Autolaturi; Autoteline; Latausjohto; Puhdistusliina; Kuulokkeet; Kuulokkeet; Kaulanauha; Puhelinkotelo; Pop socket; Kannettavat kaiuttimet; Pussi/laukku; Virtapankki; Sormuspidin; Näyttösuoja; Selfietikku; Jalusta; Stylus; Käyttöohje; Langaton laturi; Muu
tr: Cep telefonu dahil aksesuarlar: Araç içi şarj cihazı; Araç tutacağı; Şarj kablosu; Temizlik bezi; Kulaklıklar; Kulaklık; Kordon; Telefon kılıfı; Pop socket; Taşınabilir hoparlör; Kese/çanta; Power bank; Halka tutacağı; Ekran koruyucu; Selfie çubuğu; Stant; Kalem; Kullanıcı kılavuzu; Kablosuz şarj cihazı; Diğer
pl: Akcesoria do telefonu komórkowego w zestawie: Ładowarka samochodowa; Uchwyt samochodowy; Kabel do ładowania; Ściereczka do czyszczenia; Słuchawki douszne; Słuchawki nagłowne; Smycz; Etui na telefon; Pop socket; Przenośny głośnik; Saszetka/torba; Ładowarka akumulatorów; Uchwyt pierścieniowy; Osłona ekranu; Kij do selfie; Statyw; Rysik; Instrukcja obsługi; Ładowarka bezprzewodowa; Inne
en: Mobile phone accessories included: Car charger; Car mount; Charging cable; Cleaning cloth; Earphones; Headset; Lanyard; Phone case; Pop socket; Portable speaker; Pouch/bag; Power bank; Ring holder; Screen protector; Selfie stick; Stand; Stylus; User manual; Wireless charger; Other
nb: Mobiltelefon tilbehør inkludert: Billader; Bilfeste; Ladekabel; Rengjøringsklut; Øretelefoner; Hodesett; Snørebånd; Telefondeksel; Pop-sokkel; Bærbar høyttaler; Pung/veske; Powerbank; Ringholder; Skjermbeskytter; Selfiestang; Stativ; Pekepenn; Brukerhåndbok; Trådløs lader; Annet
ko: 휴대전화 포함 액세서리: 차량 충전기; 차량용 거치대; 충전 케이블; 청소용 천; 이어폰; 헤드셋; 랜야드; 휴대폰 케이스; 팝소켓; 휴대용 스피커; 파우치/가방; 파워뱅크; 링홀더; 화면 보호기; 셀카봉; 스탠드; 스타일러스; 사용 설명서; 무선 충전기; 기타
pt-PT: Acessórios de telemóvel incluídos: Carregador para carros; Suporte de carro; Cabo de carregamento; Pano de limpeza; Auriculares; Auscultadores; Cordão; Capa de telefone; Pop socket; Altifalante portátil; Bolsa/saco; Power bank; Suporte de anel; Protetor de ecrã; Bastão de selfie; Suporte; Stylus; Manual do utilizador; Carregador sem fios; Outro
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมโทรศัพท์มือถือที่รวมอยู่: ที่ชาร์จในรถ; ที่ยึดในรถ; สายชาร์จ; ผ้าทำความสะอาด; หูฟัง; ชุดหูฟัง; สายคล้อง; เคสโทรศัพท์; พ็อปซ็อกเก็ต; ลำโพงพกพา; ถุง/กระเป๋า; พาวเวอร์แบงค์; ที่จับแบบแหวน; ที่ป้องกันหน้าจอ; ไม้เซลฟี่; ที่ตั้ง; สไตลัส; คู่มือผู้ใช้; ที่ชาร์จไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 包含的手機配件: 車用充電器; 車用支架; 充電線; 清潔布; 耳機; 一副耳機; 掛繩; 手機殼; 氣囊支架; 攜帶式喇叭; 收納袋/包; 行動電源; 指環支架; 螢幕保護膜; 自拍棒; 立架; 觸控筆; 使用者手冊; 無線充電器; 其他
da: Mobiltelefon-tilbehør inkluderet: Biloplader; Bilholder; Ladekablel; Rengøringsklud; Høretelefoner; Headset; Snor; Telefonæske; Pop socket; Bærbar højttaler; Etui/taske; Powerbank; Ringholder; Skærmbeskytter; Selfiestang; Stativ; Stylus; Brugermanual; Trådløs oplader; Andet
de: Handyzubehör inklusive: Auto-Ladegerät; Autohalterung; Ladekabel; Putztuch; Kopfhörer; Headset; Halteband; Telefonhülle; Pop-Socket; Tragbarer Lautsprecher; Tasche/Beutel; Powerbank; Ringhalter; Bildschirmschutz; Selfie-Stick; Ständer; Stift; Benutzerhandbuch; Kabelloses Ladegerät; Sonstiges
ja: 携帯電話付属アクセサリー: 車の充電器; 車載マウント; 充電ケーブル; クリーニングクロス; イヤホン; ヘッドセット; ランヤード; テレホンカード; ポップソケット; ポータブルスピーカー; ポーチ/バッグ; パワーバンク; リングホルダー; 画面保護シート; 自撮り棒; スタンド; スタイラス; ユーザーマニュアル; ワイヤレス充電器; その他
ru: Аксессуары для мобильного телефона в комплекте: Автомобильное зарядное устройство; Автомобильный держатель; Зарядный кабель; Чистящая салфетка; Наушники; Гарнитура; На шнурке; Чехол для телефона; Попсокет; Портативная колонка; Чехол/сумка; Внешний аккумулятор; Кольцо-держатель; Защитная пленка для экрана; Палка для селфи; Подставка; Стилус; Руководство пользователя; Беспроводное зарядное устройство; Другой
el: Αξεσουάρ κινητού τηλεφώνου που περιλαμβάνονται: Φορτιστής αυτοκινήτου; Βάση αυτοκινήτου; Καλώδιο φόρτισης; Πανί καθαρισμού; Ακουστικά ψείρες; Κάσκα ακουστικών; Κορδόνι λαιμού; Θήκη τηλεφώνου; Pop socket; Φορητό ηχείο; Θήκη/τσάντα; Τροφοδοτικό ισχύος (Power bank); Δακτύλιος συγκράτησης; Προστατευτικό οθόνης; Μονόποδα αυτοφωτογράφησης (σέλφι); Κατακόρυφη; Γραφίδα; Εγχειρίδιο χρήστη; Ασύρματος φορτιστής; Άλλο
zh-CN: 手机包含的配件: 车载充电器; 车载支架; 充电线; 清洁布; 耳机; 耳机; 挂绳; 手机壳; 手机支架扣; 便携式音箱; 收纳袋/包; 充电宝; 指环支架; 屏幕保护膜; 自拍杆; 支架; 手写笔; 用户手册; 无线充电器; 其他
sk-SK: Príslušenstvo mobilného telefónu v balení: Nabíjačka do auta; Automobilový držiak; Nabíjací kábel; Čistiaca handrička; Slúchadlá; Náhlavná súprava; Šnúrka; Puzdro na telefón; Pop socket; Prenosný reproduktor; Vrecko/taška; Power banka; Krúžkový držiak; Ochrana obrazovky; Selfie tyč; Stojan; Ihla; Používateľská príručka; Bezdrôtová nabíjačka; Iné
it: Accessori per telefono cellulare inclusi: Caricabatteria per auto; Supporto auto; Cavo di ricarica; Panno per pulizia; Auricolari; Cuffia; Cordino; Custodia per telefono; Pop socket; Altoparlante portatile; Sacchetto/borsa; Power bank; Porta anello; Proteggi schermo; Bastone per selfie; Supporto; Stilo; Manuale utente; Caricatore wireless; Altro
lt-LT: Įtraukti mobilaus telefono priedai: Automobilio įkroviklis; Automobilinis laikiklis; Įkrovimo kabelis; Valymo šluostė; Į ausis įkišamos ausinės; Ausinės; Virvelė; Telefono dėklas; Pop socket laikiklis; Nešiojamas garsiakalbis; Dėkliukas/krepšelis; Išorinio maitinimo akumuliatorius; Žiedo formos laikiklis; Ekrano apsauga; Asmenukių lazdos; Stovas; Šviesinis rašiklis; Naudotojo vadovas; Belaidis kroviklis; Kita
nl: Mobiele telefoon accessoires inbegrepen: Autolader; Autohouder; Oplaadkabel; Schoonmaakdoekje; Oortelefoon; Headset; Sleutelkoord; Telefoonhoesje; Pop-socket; Draagbare luidspreker; Etui/tas; Powerbank; Ringhouder; Schermbeschermer; Selfiestick; Standaard; Stylus; Gebruikershandleiding; Draadloze oplader; Andere
vi: Phụ kiện điện thoại di động được bao gồm: Tẩu sạc; Giá đỡ xe hơi; Cáp sạc; Giẻ lau; Tai nghe nhét tai; Tai nghe có micrô; Dây buộc; Ốp điện thoại; Pop socket; Loa di động; Túi/bao; Sạc dự phòng; Giá đỡ nhẫn; Miếng dán bảo vệ màn hình; Gậy tự sướng; Giá đỡ; Bút cảm ứng; Hướng dẫn sử dụng; Sạc không dây; Khác
cs: Příslušenství mobilního telefonu v balení: Nabíječka do auta; Držák do auta; Nabíjecí kabel; Čisticí hadřík; Sluchátka; Headset; Šňůrka; Pouzdro na telefon; Pop socket; Přenosný reproduktor; Taštička/brašna; Powerbanka; Kroužkový držák; Chránič obrazovky; Selfie tyč; Stojan; Stylus; Uživatelská příručka; Bezdrátová nabíječka; Jiné
ro-RO: Accesorii pentru telefon mobil incluse: Încărcător auto; Suport auto; Cablu de încărcare; Lavetă de curățare; Căști auriculare; Căști; Cordon; Carcasă de telefon; Pop socket; Difuzor portabil; Săculeț/geantă; Baterie externă; Suport inelar; Protecție pentru ecran; Baston telescopic pentru selfie-uri; Suport; Stylus; Manual de utilizare; Încărcător wireless; Altele
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za mobilni telefon: Automobilski punjač; Automobilski držač; Kabel za punjenje; Krpa za čišćenje; Slušalice; Slušalice s mikrofonom; Uzica; Futrola za telefon; Pop socket; Prijenosni zvučnik; Torbica/vrećica; Prijenosni punjač; Držač prsten; Zaštita za ekran; Štap za selfije; Stalak; Olovka; Korisnički priručnik; Bežični punjač; Ostalo
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за мобилен телефон: Зарядно устройство за кола; Автомобилна стойка; Кабел за зареждане; Кърпа за почистване; Слушалки; Слушалки; Шнур; Калъф за телефон; Поп сокет; Преносим високоговорител; Калъфче/чанта; Външно зарядно устройство; Пръстен държач; Екранен протектор; Селфи стик; Стойка; Стилус; Ръководство за потребителя; Безжично зарядно; Други
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki za mobilni telefon: Avtomobilski polnilec; Avtomobilski nosilec; Polnilni kabel; Krpa za čiščenje; Slušalke; Naglavne slušalke; Vrvica; Ovitek za telefon; Pop prijemalka; Prenosni zvočnik; Torbica/vrečka; Napajalna banka; Obročasti držalec; Zaščita zaslona; Palica za selfije; Stojalo; Pisalo; Uporabniški priročnik; Brezžični polnilnik; Drugo
es: Accesorios para teléfono móvil incluidos: Cargador para automóvil; Soporte para coche; Cable de carga; Paño de limpieza; Auriculares; Auriculares; Cordón; Funda de teléfono; Pop socket; Altavoz portátil; Bolsa/funda; Banco de potencia; Soporte de anillo; Protector de pantalla; Palos para selfies; Soporte; Lápiz; Manual de usuario; Cargador inalámbrico; Otros
fr: Accessoires pour téléphone mobile inclus: Chargeur de voiture; Support de voiture; Câble de chargement; Chiffon de nettoyage; Écouteurs; Casque; Cordon; Étui de téléphone; Support PopSocket; Hauts-parleurs portatifs; Pochette/sac; Banque d’alimentation; Support anneau; Films de protection d'écran; Bâton à selfie; Support; Stylet; Manuel d'utilisation; Chargeur sans fil; Autre
hu: Mobiltelefon-tartozékok mellékelve: Autós töltő; Autós tartó; Töltőkábel; Tisztítókendők; Fülhallgató; Fejhallgató; Nyakba akasztható; Telefontok; Pop socket; Hordozható hangszóró; Tasak/táska; Power bank; Gyűrűs tartó; Képernyővédő; Szelfibot; Álló; Digitális toll; Felhasználói kézikönyv; Vezeték nélküli töltő; Egyéb
pt-BR: Acessórios de celular incluídos: Carregador de carro; Suporte para carro; Cabos de carregamento; Pano de limpeza; Fones de ouvido; Fone de ouvido; Cordão; Capa telefônica; Pop socket; Alto-falante portátil; Bolsa/sacola; Banco de potência; Suporte de anel; Protetor de tela; Bastão de selfie; Suporte; Stylus; Manual do usuário; Carregador sem fio; Outro
sv: Ingående mobiltelefontillbehör: Billaddare; Bilfäste; Laddningskabel; Rengöringsduk; Hörlurar; Headset; Snodd; Telefonfodral; Popsocket; Bärbar högtalare; Fodral/väska; Powerbank; Ringhållare; Skärmskydd; Selfiepinne; Stativ; Stylus; Användarmanual; Trådlös laddare; Övrigt